Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 2. Construction

§ 29-1-201.
Definitions; agency relationships presumed.

Except as otherwise provided, as used in this act:

“Contractor” means:

A person employed by and contracting with an owner to improve an owner’s property including:

An architect;

A professional engineer; and

A surveyor.

“Furnish” includes selling or renting;

“Improve or improvement” means:

Demolition, erection, alteration or repair of any property for its permanent benefit;

Any work performed or material furnished for the permanent change of any real property; and

Materials manufactured pursuant to contract.

“Lien claimant” means any person who claims a lien under this act pursuant to a contract for improvement of property entered into by an owner of the property;

“Owner” means:

With respect to construction liens: any person with a legal or equitable interest in the property to be changed, altered or improved, for whose use or benefit any improvement shall be made or any materials furnished;

With respect to mines, quarries, oil, gas or other wells: a person holding any interest in the legal or equitable title, or both, to any leasehold for oil or gas purposes and purchasers under executory contract, receivers and trustees;

With respect to ditches, canals and reservoirs: a person holding any interest in the legal or equitable title to any ditch, canal or reservoir including rights-of-way, water permits, ditch rights and related easements of any type or kind. “Owner” includes purchasers under executory contract, receivers and trustees.

“Subcontractor” means a person, other than a contractor performing work for a contractor or subcontractor under contract;

“Work” shall be as requested, authorized or ratified under contract;

“Material” means:

Component parts incorporated into the project;

Equipment and machinery, whether or not incorporated into the project; and

Fuel and lubricants consumed in a project.

“Materialman” means a person other than a contractor who furnishes material to, but does not perform work for, an owner, a contractor or subcontractor under contract;

“Property” means real property, personal property, or both;

“Real property” means all interests in real property, including but not limited to, the fee estate, leasehold interests, easements and rights of way;

“Send” or “sent” means, in connection with any writing or written notice, to deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by any other usual means of communication with postage or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if no address is specified, to any address reasonable under the circumstances. The foregoing method of delivery includes delivery by any commercial carrier that requests and maintains a receipt for delivery of written documents and also includes an electronic record as set forth in the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act if the sender and recipient have previously communicated by electronic means. In the event any writing is transmitted by mail with the United States postal service, such writing shall be mailed by first class mail, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by mail delivery requiring a receipt for delivery. The time a writing is deemed to have been sent is the time at which the writing is deposited in the mail or delivered for transmission by any other means and, in the case of an electronic record, the time of sending is as specified in W.S.

40-21-115

;

“Written” or “writing” means printing, typewriting or any other intentional reduction to tangible form, including an electronic record created, generated, sent, communicated, received or restored by electronic means;

“This act” means W.S.

29-1-103

through

29-10-106

.

Only the following agency relationships are presumed in this act:

If any spouse enters into a contract for the performance of any work or the furnishing of any materials for the benefit of the property of the other spouse for which a lien is provided by this act, the spouse contracting for the work shall be presumed to be the agent of the spouse owning the property;

Between joint tenants;

Among tenants in common; and

An employee is an agent of his employer.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2; 2011, ch. 130, § 1; 2012, ch. 35, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “act” for “title” in the introductory language of (a) and (b) and in (a)(iv) and (b)(i); deleted “as used in this act” following “ ‘Owner’ ” in the introductory language of (a)(v); in (a)(vi), deleted “or ‘materialman’ ” preceding “means a person,” substituted “for” for “or furnishing materials to an owner or” and inserted “or subcontractor”; and added (a)(viii) through (a)(xiv).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xii), inserted “first class mail, by.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(viii)(C) and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2012, ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2012, provides: “This act shall apply to all fuel or lubricants furnished to a construction project on or after July 1, 2012.”

Company furnishing materials for construction, but not installing materials, deemed “materialman,” not “contractor.” —

A company who entered a contract with the record owner of real property to furnish materials for the construction of a home on the property, but installed no materials into the new home, was a “materialman,” not a “contractor,” and had to file its lien statement within the 90-day time period provided by § 29-2-106(a). Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Walters, 707 P.2d 733,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 585

(Wyo. 1985).

Notice of intention to file lien sent to present owners of property. —

Inasmuch as the lien claimant failed to comply with the statutory requirement of giving proper notice to the owners of the property at the time the notice of intention to file lien was sent, although these parties were not the record owners at the time the claimant entered into a contract to supply materials to the then record owner, the lien was ineffective. Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Walters, 707 P.2d 733,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 585

(Wyo. 1985).

Subsection (b) does not abrogate general law of agency

for purposes of making lien statements. Stricker v. Frauendienst, 669 P.2d 520,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 363

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

D & L Bldg., Inc. v. State ex rel. Maltby Tank & Barge, Inc., 747 P.2d 517,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Diamond Hill Inv. Co. v. Shelden, 767 P.2d 1005,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vacation and sick pay and other fringe benefits as within mechanic's lien statute, 20 ALR4th 1268.